Utah statutes.
62A-15-634.   Detention pending placement in custody.

Pending commitment to a local mental health authority, a patient taken into custody or ordered to be committed pursuant to this part may be detained in the patient's home, a licensed foster home, or any other suitable facility under reasonable conditions prescribed by the  local mental health authority.  Except in an extreme emergency, the patient may not be detained in a nonmedical facility used for the detention of individuals charged with or convicted of criminal offenses.  The  local mental health authority shall take reasonable measures, including provision of medical care, as may be necessary to assure proper care of an individual temporarily detained pursuant to this section.

